Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-705 Severability. If any
provision of this article or the application of such provision to any
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the article or the application
of the provision to other circumstances, shall not be affected thereby. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next